en: Squash caviar, squash paste, zucchini caviar
ru: Икра из кабачков, кабачковая икра

en: Eggplant caviar, eggplant paste, aubergine caviar, aubergine paste
de: Auberginen-Kaviar, Auberginenkaviar
fi: munakoisotahna
fr: Caviars d'aubergine, caviar d'aubergine
hr: Kavijar od patlidžana
it: Caviale di melanzane, Pasta di melanzane
nl: Auberginekaviaar
ru: Икра из баклажанов, баклажанная икра

en: Ajvar
ar: أيفار
be: Айвар
bg: Айвар
bs: Ajvar
cs: Ajvar
cv: Айвар
de: Ajvar
el: Άιβαρ
eo: Ajvaro
es: Ajvar
eu: Ajvar
fi: Ajvar
fr: Ajvar
hr: Ajvar
hu: Ajvár
hy: Այվար
it: Ajvar
ja: アイバル
jv: Ajvar
kk: Айвар
ko: 아이바르
lb: Ajvar
lv: Ajvars
mk: Ајвар
nl: Ajvar
no: Ajvar
pl: Ajwar
ru: Айвар
sh: Ajvar
sk: Ajvar
sl: Ajvar
sq: Ajvari
sr: Ајвар
sv: Ajvar
tr: Ayvar
uk: Айвар
uz: Ayvar
vi: Ajvar
zh: 红椒酱

en: Potato salads
da: Kartoffelsalater
de: Kartoffelsalate
es: Ensaladas de patata
fi: perunasalaatit
fr: Salades de pommes de terre
hr: Krumpir salate
it: Insalata di patate
ja: ポテトサラダ
lt: Salotos su bulvėmis
nl: Aardappelsalade
pl: Sałatki ziemniaczane, Sałatka ziemniaczana, Sałatka z ziemniakami
pt: Salatas de batata
sv: Potatissallader, Potatissallad

en: Piemontese salads, Potato salad piémontaise-style
fr: Salades piémontaises, Salade de pomme de terre à la piémontaise
hr: Piemontese salate
lt: Piemontietiškos salotos
nl: Salade uit Piëmont

en: Prepared potatoes salad home-made
fr: Salade de pommes de terre maison

en: Piemontese salads with ham
fr: Salades piémontaises au jambon, piémontaises au jambon
hr: Piemontese salate sa šunkom
lt: Piemontietiškos salotos su kumpiu
nl: Salades uit Piëmont met ham

en: Piemontese salads with chicken
fr: Salades piémontaises au poulet, piémontaises au poulet
hr: Piemontese salate s piletinom
lt: Piemontietiškos salotos su vištiena

en: Vegan potato salads
da: Veganske kartoffelsalater
sv: Veganska potatissallader

en: Rice salads, Prepared rice salads
de: Reissalate
es: Ensaladas de arroz
fr: Salades de riz, Salade de riz
hr: Salate od riže
lt: Salotos su ryžiais, Ryžių salotos
nl: Rijstsalade

en: Pasta salads
de: Nudelsalate
es: Ensaladas de pasta
fi: pastasalaatit
fr: Salades de pâtes
hr: Salate od tjestenine
it: Insalate di pasta
lt: Salotos su makaronais
nl: Pastasalades
pl: Sałatki z makaronem, Sałatki makaronowe

en: Vegetarian pasta salads, Prepared vegetarian pasta salad
de: vegetarische Nudelsalate
fi: Kasvispastasalaatit
fr: Salades de pâtes végétariennes
hr: Vegetarijanske salate od tjestenine
lt: Vegetariškos salotos su makaronais, Vegetariškos makaronų salotos
nl: Vegetarische pasta salades
pl: Wegetariańskie sałatki z makaronem, Wegetariańskie sałatki makaronowe

en: Pasta salad with fish, Prepared vegetable and pasta salad with fish
fr: Salade de pâtes au poisson, Salade de pâtes aux légumes avec poisson
hr: Salata od tjestenine s ribom
lt: Makaronų salotos su žuvimi

en: Pasta salads with surimi, Surimi and pasta salads
fr: Salades de pâtes au surimi, Salades au surimi et aux pâtes
hr: Salate od tjestenine sa surimijem
lt: Makaronų salotos su surimi

en: Pasta salads with salmon, Salmon and pasta salads
fr: Salades de pâtes au saumon, Salades au saumon et aux pâtes
hr: Salate od tjestenine s lososom
lt: Makaronų salotos su lašiša

en: Pasta salad with tuna, Tuna and pasta salads
fr: Salades de pâtes au thon, Salades au thon et aux pâtes
hr: Salata od tjestenine s tunjevinom
lt: Makaronų salotos su tunu

en: Pasta salad with meat, Prepared vegetable and pasta salad with meat
fr: Salade de pâtes à la viande, Salade de pâtes aux légumes avec viande
hr: Salata od tjestenine s mesom
lt: Makaronų salotos su mėsa

en: Pasta salad with chicken, Chicken and pasta salads
fr: Salades de pâtes au poulet, Salades au poulet et aux pâtes
hr: Salata od tjestenine s piletinom
lt: Makaronų salotos su vištiena

en: Double crust pies, Two-crust pies, 2 crust pies
es: Empanadas grandes
fr: Tourtes, Tourte
hr: Pite s dvije kore
nl: Pasteitjes

en: Vegetarian double crust pies
fr: Tourtes végétariennes